California statutes. Vehicle Code
 position within the driver’s compartment that would enable the accompanying licensed driver to assist the person in controlling the vehicle as may be necessary to avoid a collision and to provide immediate guidance in the safe operation of the vehicle.

(e) A person, while having in their immediate possession a valid permit issued pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), may only operate a government-owned motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, motorized scooter, or a motorized bicycle, when taking driver training instruction administered by the California National Guard.

(f) The department may also issue an instruction permit to a person who has been issued a valid driver’s license to authorize the person to obtain driver training instruction and to practice that instruction
 in order to obtain another class of driver’s license or an endorsement.

(g) The department may further restrict permits issued under subdivision (a) as it may determine to be appropriate to ensure the safe operation of a motor vehicle by the permittee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 295, Sec. 12.   (AB 2956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12509.5.

(a) A person shall obtain an instruction permit issued pursuant to this section before operating, or being issued a class M1 or M2 driver’s license to operate, a two-wheel motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, motorized bicycle, moped, or bicycle with an attached motor. The person shall meet the following requirements to obtain an instruction permit for purposes of this section:

(1) If age 15 years and 6 months or older, but under the age of 18 years, the applicant shall meet all of the following requirements:

(A) Have a valid class C license or complete driver education and training pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a)
 of Section 12814.6.

(B) Successfully complete a motorcyclist safety program that is operated pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 2930) of Chapter 5 of Division 2.

(C) Pass the motorcycle driver’s written exam.

(2) If 18 years of age or older, but under 21 years of age, the applicant shall meet both of the following requirements:

(A) Successfully complete a motorcyclist safety program that is operated pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 2930) of Chapter 5 of Division 2.

(B) Pass the motorcycle driver’s written exam.

(3) If 21 years of age or older, pass the motorcycle driver’s written exam.

(b) A person described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) shall hold an instruction permit issued pursuant to this section for a minimum of six months before being issued a class M1 or M2 license.

(c) A person issued an instruction permit pursuant to this section shall not operate a two-wheel motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, motorized bicycle, moped, or bicycle with an attached motor during the hours of darkness, shall stay off any freeways that have full control of access and have no crossings at grade, and shall not carry any passenger except an instructor licensed under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11100) of Division 5 or a qualified instructor as defined in Section 41907 of
 the Education Code.

(d) An instruction permit issued pursuant to this section shall be valid for a period not exceeding 24 months from the date of application.

(e) The department may perform, during regularly scheduled computer system maintenance and upgrades, any necessary software updates related to the changes made by the addition, during the 2009–10 Regular Session, of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 636, Sec. 6.   (AB 1810)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

12511.

No person shall have in his or her possession or otherwise under his or her control more than one driver’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1509, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12512.

Except as provided in Sections 12513, 12514, and 12814.6, no license to drive shall be issued to a person under the age of 18 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 596, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12513.

(a) Upon application, successful completion of tests and compliance with Sections 17700 to 17705, inclusive, the department may issue a junior permit to any person 14 years of age, but less than 18, who establishes eligibility as required by this section. A person is eligible when, in the opinion of the department, any one or more of the following circumstances exist:

School or other transportation facilities are inadequate for regular attendance at school and at activities authorized by
 the school. The application for a junior permit shall be accompanied by a signed statement from the school principal verifying such facts. A junior permit issued under this subsection shall be restricted to operating a vehicle from residence to the school and return.

Reasonable transportation facilities are inadequate and operation of a vehicle by a minor is necessary due to illness of a family member. The application shall be accompanied by a signed statement from a physician familiar with the condition, containing a diagnosis and probable date when sufficient recovery will have been made to terminate the emergency.

Transportation facilities are inadequate, and use of a motor vehicle is necessary in the transportation to and from the employment of the applicant and the applicant’s income from such employment is essential in the support of the family, or where the applicant’s operation of a motor vehicle is essential to an
 enterprise from which an appreciable portion of the income of the family will be derived. The application shall be accompanied by a signed statement from the parents or the guardian, setting forth the reasons a permit is necessary under this subsection.

(b) The existence of public transportation at reasonable intervals within one mile of the residence of the applicant may be considered adequate grounds for refusal of a junior permit.

(c) The department shall impose restrictions upon junior permits appropriate to the conditions and area under which they are intended to be used.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 947, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12514.

(a) Junior permits issued pursuant to Section 12513 shall not be valid for a period exceeding that established on the original request as the approximate date the minor’s operation of a vehicle will no longer be necessary. In any event, no permit shall be valid on or after the 18th birthday of the applicant.

(b) The department may revoke any permit when to do so is necessary for the welfare of the minor or in the
 interests of safety.

(c) If conditions or location of residence, which required the minor’s operation of a vehicle, change prior to expiration of the permit, the department may cancel the permit.

(d) Upon a determination that the permittee has operated a vehicle in violation of restrictions, the department shall revoke the permit.

(e) A junior permit is a form of driver’s license that shall include all information required by subdivision (a) of Section 12811 except for an engraved picture or photograph of the permittee, and is subject to all provisions of this code applying to driver’s licenses, except as otherwise provided in this section and Section 12513.

(f) An instruction permit valid for a period of not more than six months may be issued after
 eligibility has been established under Section 12513.

(g) The department shall cancel any permit six months from the date of issuance unless the permittee has complied with one of the conditions prescribed by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 12814.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1035, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12515.

(a) No person under the age of 18 years shall be employed for compensation by another for the purpose of driving a motor vehicle on the highways.

(b) No person under the age of 21 years shall be employed for compensation by another to drive, and no person under the age of 21 years may drive a motor vehicle, as defined in Section 34500 or subdivision (b) of Section 15210, that is engaged in interstate commerce, or any motor vehicle that is engaged in the interstate or
 intrastate transportation of hazardous material, as defined in Section 353.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1509, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

12516.

It is unlawful for any person under the age of 18 years to drive a school bus transporting pupils to or from school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12517.

(a) (1) A person may not operate a schoolbus while transporting pupils unless that person has in his or her immediate possession a valid driver’s license for the appropriate class of vehicle to be driven endorsed for schoolbus and passenger transportation.

(2) When transporting one or more pupils at or below the 12th-grade level to or from a public or private school or to or from public or private
 school activities, the person described in paragraph (1) shall have in his or her immediate possession a certificate issued by the department to permit the operation of a schoolbus.

(b) A person may not operate a school pupil activity bus unless that person has in his or her immediate possession a valid driver’s license for the appropriate class of vehicle to be driven endorsed for passenger transportation. When transporting one or more pupils at or below the 12th-grade level to or from public or private school activities, the person shall also have in his or her immediate possession a certificate issued by the department to permit the operation of school pupil activity buses.

(c) The applicant for a certificate to operate a schoolbus or school pupil activity bus shall meet the eligibility and training requirements specified for schoolbus and school pupil activity busdrivers in
 this code, the Education Code, and regulations adopted by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and, in addition to the fee authorized in Section 2427, shall pay a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) with the application for issuance of an original certificate, and a fee of twelve dollars ($12) for the renewal of that certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 574, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

12517.1.

(a) A “schoolbus accident” means any of the following:

(1) A motor vehicle accident resulting in property damage in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or personal injury, on public or private property, and involving a schoolbus, youth bus, school pupil activity bus, or general public paratransit vehicle transporting a pupil.

(2) A collision between a vehicle and a pupil or a schoolbus driver while the pupil or driver is crossing the highway when the schoolbus flashing red signal lamps are required to be operated pursuant to Section 22112 or when the schoolbus is stopped for the purpose of loading or unloading pupils.

(3) Injury of a pupil inside a vehicle described in paragraph (1) as a result of acceleration, deceleration, or other movement of the vehicle.

(b) The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall investigate all schoolbus accidents, except that accidents involving only property damage and occurring entirely on private property shall be investigated only if they involve a violation of this code.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2017.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 23) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 24.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12517.2.

(a) Applicants for an original or renewal certificate to drive a schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, youth bus, general public paratransit vehicle, or farm labor vehicle shall submit a report of a medical examination of the applicant given not more than two years prior to the date of the application by a physician licensed to practice medicine, a licensed advanced practice registered nurse qualified to
 perform a medical examination, a licensed physician assistant, or a licensed doctor of chiropractic listed on the most current National Registry of Certified Medical Examiners, as adopted by the United States Department of Transportation, as published by the notice in the Federal Register, Volume 77, Number 77, Friday, April 20, 2012, on pages 24104 to 24135, inclusive, and pursuant to Section 391.42 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The report shall be on a form approved by the department.

(b) Schoolbus drivers, within the same month of reaching 65 years of age and each 12th month thereafter, shall undergo a medical examination, pursuant to Section 12804.9, and shall submit a report of that medical examination on a form as specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 160, Sec. 1.   (AB 722)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

12517.3.

(a) (1) An applicant for an original certificate to drive a schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, youth bus, or general public paratransit vehicle shall be fingerprinted by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, on a form provided or approved by the Department of the California Highway Patrol for submission to the Department of Justice, utilizing the Applicant Expedite Service or an electronic fingerprinting system.

(2) An applicant fingerprint form shall be processed and returned to the office of the Department of the California Highway Patrol from which it originated not later than 15 working days from the date on which the fingerprint form was received by the Department of Justice, unless circumstances, other than the administrative duties of the Department of Justice, warrant further investigation.

(3) Applicant fingerprints that are submitted by utilizing an electronic fingerprinting system shall be processed and returned to the appropriate office of the Department of the California Highway Patrol within three working days.

(4) The commissioner may utilize the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System to conduct a preliminary criminal and driver history check to determine an applicant’s eligibility to hold an
 original or renewal certificate to drive a schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, youth bus, or general public paratransit vehicle.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an applicant for an original certificate to drive a schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, youth bus, or general public paratransit vehicle may be fingerprinted by a public law enforcement agency, a school district, or a county office of education utilizing an electronic fingerprinting system with terminals managed by the Department of Justice.

(2) The Department of Justice shall provide the fingerprint information processed pursuant to this subdivision to the appropriate office of the Department of the California Highway Patrol within three working days of receipt of the information.

(3) An applicant for an original
 certificate to drive an ambulance shall submit a completed fingerprint card to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 311, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

12517.4.

This section governs the issuance of a certificate to drive a schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, youth bus, general public paratransit vehicle, or farm labor vehicle.

(a) The driver certificate shall be issued only to applicants meeting all applicable provisions of this code and passing the examinations prescribed by the department and the Department of the California
 Highway Patrol. The examinations shall be conducted by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, pursuant to Sections 12517, 12519, 12522, 12523, and 12523.5.

(b) A temporary driver certificate shall be issued by the Department of the California Highway Patrol after an applicant has cleared a criminal history background check by the Department of Justice and, if applicable, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and has passed the examinations and meets all other applicable provisions of this code.

(c) A permanent driver’s certificate shall be issued by the department after an applicant has passed all tests and met all applicable provisions of this code. Certificates are valid for a maximum of five years and shall expire on the fifth birthday following the issuance of an original certificate or the expiration of the certificate renewed.

(d) A holder of a certificate may not violate any restriction placed on the certificate. Depending upon the type of vehicle used in the driving test and the abilities and physical condition of the applicant, the Department of the California Highway Patrol and the department may place restrictions on a certificate to assure the safe operation of a motor vehicle and safe transportation of passengers. These restrictions may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Automatic transmission only.

(2) Hydraulic brakes only.

(3) Type 2 bus only.

(4) Conventional or type 2 bus only.

(5) Two-axle motor truck or passenger
 vehicle only.

(e) A holder of a certificate may not drive a motor vehicle equipped with a two-speed rear axle unless the certificate is endorsed: “May drive vehicle with two-speed rear axle.”

(f) This section shall become operative on September 20, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 952, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Amended version operative September 20, 2005, pursuant to earlier operation of new subdivision (f).)
-------------------------------------------

12517.45.

(a) A person shall not operate a motor vehicle described in subdivision (k) of Section 545 while transporting school pupils at or below the 12th-grade level to or from a public or private school or to or from public or private school activities, unless all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The person has in his or her immediate possession all of the following:

(A) A valid driver’s license of a class appropriate to the vehicle driven and that is endorsed for passenger transportation.

(B) Either a certificate to drive a schoolbus as described in Section 40082 of the Education Code, or a certificate to drive a school pupil activity bus as described in Section 40083 of the Education Code, issued by the department in accordance with eligibility and training requirements specified by the department, the State Department of Education, and the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(C) A parental authorization form for each pupil signed by a parent or a legal guardian of the pupil that gives permission for that pupil to be transported to or from the school or school-related activity.

(2) (A) The
 motor vehicle has passed an annual inspection conducted by the Department of the California Highway Patrol and is in compliance with the charter-party carrier’s responsibilities under Section 5374 of the Public Utilities Code.

(B) The Department of the California Highway Patrol may charge a charter-party carrier a reasonable fee sufficient to cover the costs incurred by the Department of the California Highway Patrol in conducting the annual inspection of a motor vehicle.

(b) A driver of a motor vehicle described in subdivision (k) of Section 545 shall comply with the duties specified in subdivision (a) of Section 5384.1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 649, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

12517.5.

A person who is employed as a driver of a paratransit vehicle shall not operate that vehicle unless the person meets both of the following requirements:

(a) Has in his or her immediate possession a valid driver’s license of a class appropriate to the vehicle driven.

(b) Successfully completes, during each calendar year, four hours of training administered by, or at the
 direction of, his or her employer or the employer’s agent on the safe operation of paratransit vehicles and four hours of training on the special transportation needs of the persons he or she is employed to transport.

This subdivision may be satisfied if the driver receives transportation training or a certificate, or both, pursuant to Section 40082, 40083, 40085, 40085.5, or 40088 of the Education Code.

The employer shall maintain a record of the current training received by each driver in his or her employ and shall present that record on demand to any authorized representative of the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 217.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

12518.

The provisions of Section 12504 shall apply to any nonresident who is under the age of 18 years and who is a member of the armed forces of the United States on active duty within this state, except that the maximum period during which such nonresident may operate a motor vehicle in this state without obtaining a driver’s license or a nonresident minor’s certificate shall be limited to a period of 60 days immediately following the entry of such nonresident into this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1748.)
-------------------------------------------

12519.

(a) No person shall operate a farm labor vehicle unless the person has in his or her possession a driver’s license for the appropriate class of vehicle to be driven, endorsed for passenger transportation, and, when transporting one or more farmworker passengers, a certificate issued by the department to permit the operation of farm labor vehicles.

(b) The applicants shall present evidence that they have successfully completed the driver training course developed by
 the Department of Education pursuant to Section 40081 of the Education Code, and approved by the Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of the California Highway Patrol before a permanent certificate will be issued.

(c) The certificate shall be issued only to applicants qualified by examinations prescribed by the Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of the California Highway Patrol and upon payment of a fee of twelve dollars ($12) to the Department of the California Highway Patrol.The examinations shall be conducted by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(d) A person holding a valid certificate to permit the operation of a farm labor vehicle, issued prior to January 1, 1991, shall not be required to reapply for a certificate to satisfy any additional requirements imposed by the act adding this subdivision until the certificate he or she holds
 expires or is canceled or revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1360, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

12520.

(a) No person employed as a tow truck driver, as defined in Section 2430.1, shall operate a tow truck unless that person has, in his or her immediate possession, a valid California driver’s license of an appropriate class for the vehicle to be driven, and a tow truck driver certificate issued by the department or a temporary tow truck driver certificate issued by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, to permit the operation of the tow truck. 

(b) When notified that the applicant has been cleared through the Department of Justice or the Federal Bureau of Investigation, or both, and if the applicant meets all other applicable provisions of this code, the department shall issue a permanent tow truck driver certificate. The permanent tow truck driver certificate shall be valid for a maximum of five years and shall expire on the same date as that of the applicant’s driver’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1043, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12521.

An operator of a tour bus shall, at all times when operating the tour bus, do all the following:

(a) Use a safety belt.

(b) Report any accidents involving the tour bus to the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1360, Sec. 22.5.)
-------------------------------------------

12522.

(a) Every person who operates a schoolbus or youth bus in the transportation of school pupils shall, in addition to any other requirement for a schoolbus or youth bus driver’s certificate, qualify by an examination on first aid practices deemed necessary for schoolbus operators or youth bus operators. Standards for examination shall be determined by the Emergency Medical Services Authority after consultation with the State Department of Education, the Department of Motor Vehicles,
 and the Department of the California Highway Patrol. The local school authority employing the applicant shall provide a course of instruction concerning necessary first aid practices.

(b) The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall conduct the first aid examination as part of the examination of applicants for a schoolbus or youth bus driver’s certificate and shall certify to the Department of Motor Vehicles that the applicant has satisfactorily demonstrated his or her qualifications in first aid practices, knowledge of schoolbus or youth bus laws and regulations, and ability to operate a schoolbus or youth bus. The first aid certifications shall be valid for the term of the schoolbus or youth bus driver’s certificate.

(c) The first aid examination may be waived if the applicant possesses either of the following minimum qualifications:

(1) A current first aid certificate issued by the American Red Cross or by an organization whose first aid training program is at least equivalent to the American Red Cross first aid training program, as determined by the Emergency Medical Services Authority. The Emergency Medical Services Authority may charge a fee, sufficient to cover its administrative costs of approval, to an organization that applies to have its first aid training program approved for purposes of this paragraph.

(2) A current license as a physician and surgeon, osteopathic physician and surgeon, or registered nurse, or a current certificate as a physician’s assistant or emergency medical technician. The first aid certificate or license shall be maintained throughout the term of the schoolbus or youth bus driver’s certificate and shall be presented upon demand of any traffic officer. The schoolbus or youth bus
 driver’s certificate shall not be valid during any time that the driver fails to maintain and possess that license or certificate after the first aid examination has been waived.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 226, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12523.

(a) No person shall operate a youth bus without having in possession a valid driver’s license of the appropriate class, endorsed for passenger transportation and a certificate issued by the department to permit the operation of a youth bus.

(b) Applicants for a certificate to drive a youth bus shall present evidence that they have
 successfully completed a driver training course administered by or at the direction of their employer consisting of a minimum of 10 hours of classroom instruction covering applicable laws and regulations and defensive driving practices and a minimum of 10 hours of behind-the-wheel training in a vehicle to be used as a youth bus. Applicants seeking to renew a certificate to drive a youth bus shall present evidence that they have received two hours of refresher training during each 12 months of driver certificate validity.

(c) The driver certificate shall be issued only to applicants qualified by examinations prescribed by the Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and upon payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) for an original certificate and twelve dollars ($12) for the renewal of that certificate to the Department of the California Highway Patrol. The examinations shall be conducted by the
 Department of the California Highway Patrol. The Department of Motor Vehicles may deny, suspend, or revoke a certificate valid for driving a youth bus for the causes specified in this code or in regulations adopted pursuant to this code.

(d) An operator of a youth bus shall, at all times when operating a youth bus, do all of the following:

(1) Use seat belts.

(2) Refrain from smoking tobacco products.

(3) Report any accidents reportable under Section 16000 to the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(e) A person holding a valid certificate to permit the operation of a youth bus, issued prior to January 1, 1991, shall not be required to reapply for a certificate to satisfy any
 additional requirements imposed by the act adding this subdivision until the certificate he or she holds expires or is canceled or revoked.

(f) For purposes of this section, “smoking” has the same meaning as in subdivision (c) of Section 22950.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(g) For purposes of this section, “tobacco product” means a product or device as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 22950.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 7, Sec. 27.   (SB 5 2x)   Effective June 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12523.5.

(a) No person shall operate a general public paratransit vehicle unless he or she has in his or her possession a valid driver’s license of the appropriate class endorsed for passenger transportation when operating a vehicle designed, used, or maintained for carrying more than 10 persons including the driver and either (1) a certificate issued by the department to permit the operation of a general public paratransit vehicle, or (2) a certificate issued by the department to drive a schoolbus or school pupil activity bus pursuant
 to Section 12517.

(b) Applicants for a certificate to drive a general public paratransit vehicle shall pay a fee to the Department of the California Highway Patrol of twenty-five dollars ($25) for an original certificate and twelve dollars ($12) for a renewal certificate. Applicants for an original certificate shall present evidence that they have successfully completed a driver training course consisting of a minimum of 40 hours of instruction within the previous two years. The instruction shall have covered applicable laws and regulations and defensive driving practices, a minimum of eight hours of certified defensive driving, and a minimum of 20 hours of behind-the-wheel training in a vehicle to be used as a general public paratransit vehicle. Applicants seeking to renew a certificate valid for driving a general public paratransit vehicle shall present evidence that they have received two hours of refresher training during each 12 months of
 driver certificate validity.

(c) The driver certificate shall be issued only to applicants qualified by examinations prescribed by the Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of the California Highway Patrol. The examinations shall be conducted by the Department of the California Highway Patrol. The Department of Motor Vehicles may deny, suspend, or revoke a certificate valid for driving a general public paratransit vehicle for the causes specified in this code or the Education Code or in regulations adopted pursuant to this code or the Education Code.

(d) An operator of a general public paratransit vehicle shall do all of the following:

(1) Use seatbelts.

(2) Refrain from smoking.

(3) Report any accident reportable under Section 16000 to the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(e) A person holding a valid certificate to permit the operation of a general public paratransit vehicle, issued prior to January 1, 1991, shall not be required to reapply for a certificate to satisfy any additional requirements imposed by the act adding this subdivision until the certificate he or she holds expires or is canceled or revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1360, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

12523.6.

(a) (1) On and after March 1, 1998, no person who is employed primarily as a driver of a motor vehicle that is used for the transportation of persons with developmental disabilities, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 4512 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, shall operate that motor vehicle unless that person has in his or her possession a valid driver’s license of the appropriate class and a valid special driver certificate issued by the
 department.

(2) This subdivision only applies to a person who is employed by a business, a nonprofit organization, or a state or local public agency.

(b) The special driver certificate shall be issued only to an applicant who has cleared a criminal history background check by the Department of Justice and, if applicable, by the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(1) In order to determine the applicant’s suitability as the driver of a vehicle used for the transportation of persons with developmental disabilities, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall require the applicant to furnish to that department, on a form provided or approved by that department for submission to the Department of Justice, a full set of fingerprints sufficient to enable a criminal background investigation.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), an applicant shall furnish to the Department of the California Highway Patrol evidence of having resided in this state for seven consecutive years immediately prior to the date of application for the certificate.

(3) If an applicant is unable to furnish the evidence required under paragraph (2), the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall require the applicant to furnish an additional full set of fingerprints. That department shall submit those fingerprint cards to the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice shall, in turn, submit the additional full set of fingerprints required under this paragraph to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check.

(4) Applicant fingerprint forms shall be processed and returned to the area
 office of the Department of the California Highway Patrol from which they originated not later than 15 working days from the date on which the fingerprint forms were received by the Department of Justice, unless circumstances, other than the administrative duties of the Department of Justice, warrant further investigation. Upon implementation of an electronic fingerprinting system with terminals located statewide and managed by the Department of Justice, the Department of Justice shall ascertain the information required pursuant to this subdivision within three working days.

(5) The applicant shall pay, in addition to the fees authorized in Section 2427, a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) for an original certificate and twelve dollars ($12) for the renewal of that certificate to the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(c) A certificate issued under this section shall not
 be deemed a certification to operate a particular vehicle that otherwise requires a driver’s license or endorsement for a particular class under this code.

(d) On or after March 1, 1998, no person who operates a business or a nonprofit organization or agency shall employ a person who is employed primarily as a driver of a motor vehicle for hire that is used for the transportation of persons with developmental disabilities unless the employed person operates the motor vehicle in compliance with subdivision (a).

(e) Nothing in this section precludes an employer of persons who are occasionally used as drivers of motor vehicles for the transportation of persons with developmental disabilities from requiring those persons, as a condition of employment, to obtain a special driver certificate pursuant to this section or precludes any volunteer driver from applying for a special driver
 certificate.

(f) As used in this section, a person is employed primarily as driver if that person performs at least 50 percent of his or her time worked including, but not limited to, time spent assisting persons onto and out of the vehicle, or at least 20 hours a week, whichever is less, as a compensated driver of a motor vehicle for hire for the transportation of persons with developmental disabilities.

(g) This section does not apply to any person who has successfully completed a background investigation prescribed by law, including, but not limited to, health care transport vehicle operators, or to the operator of a taxicab regulated pursuant to Section 21100. This section does not apply to a person who holds a valid certificate, other than a farm labor vehicle driver certificate, issued under Section 12517.4 or 12527. This section does not apply to a driver who provides
 transportation on a noncommercial basis to persons with developmental disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

12524.

A class A, class B, or class C driver’s licenseholder shall not operate a vehicle hauling highway route controlled quantities of radioactive materials, as defined in Section 173.403 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, unless the driver possesses a valid license of the appropriate class and a certificate of training as required in Section 397.101(e) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 397, Sec. 2.   (SB 810)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12525.

Mechanics or other maintenance personnel may operate vehicles requiring a schoolbus endorsement or certificates issued pursuant to Section 2512, 12517, 12519, 12523, or 12523.5 without obtaining a schoolbus endorsement or those certificates if that operation is within the course of their employment and they do not transport pupils or members of the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 574, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

12527.

In addition to satisfying all requirements specified in this code and in regulations adopted pursuant to this code, an applicant for an ambulance driver certificate shall satisfy all of the following requirements:

(a) Except as otherwise provided, every ambulance driver responding to an emergency call or transporting patients shall be at least 18 years of age, hold a driver’s license valid in California, possess a valid ambulance driver certificate, and be trained and competent in ambulance operation and the use of safety and emergency care equipment required by the California Code of Regulations governing ambulances.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (e), a person shall not operate an ambulance unless the person has in
 their immediate possession a driver’s license for the appropriate class of vehicle to be driven and a certificate issued by the department to permit the operation of an ambulance.

(c) An ambulance driver certificate shall only be issued by the department upon the successful completion of an examination conducted by the department and subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) An applicant for an original or renewal driver certificate shall submit a report of medical examination on a form approved by the department, the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration, or the Federal Aviation Administration. The report shall be dated within the two years preceding the application date.

(2) An applicant for an original driver certificate shall submit an acceptable fingerprint card.
